Illinois, session 104th, SB1482.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Certified Anesthesiologist Assistant Practice Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The practice of anesthesiology is the 7practice of medicine. The practice as a certified 8anesthesiologist assistant in this State is declared to affect 9the public health, safety, and welfare and to be subject to 10regulation and control in the public interest. The purpose and 11legislative intent of this Act is to encourage and promote the 12more effective utilization of the skills of anesthesiologists 13by enabling them to delegate certain medical care to certified 14anesthesiologist assistants where such delegation is 15consistent with the health and welfare of the patient and is 16conducted at the direction of and under the responsible 17supervision of an anesthesiologist.18    It is further declared to be a matter of public health and 19concern that the practice as a certified anesthesiologist 20assistant, as defined in this Act, merit and receive the 21confidence of the public and that only qualified persons be 22authorized to practice as a certified anesthesiologist 23assistant in this State. This Act shall be liberally construed   SB1482- 2 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1to best carry out these subjects and purposes. 2    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:3    "Address of record" means the address recorded by the 4Department in the applicant's application file or the 5licensee's license file, as maintained by the Department's 6licensure maintenance unit.7    "Anesthesiologist" means a physician licensed to practice 8medicine in all its branches by the Department who has 9completed a residency in anesthesiology approved by the 10American Board of Anesthesiology or the American Osteopathic 11Board of Anesthesiology, is board eligible or board certified, 12holds an unrestricted license, and is actively engaged in 13clinical practice.14    "Board" means the Illinois State Medical Board constituted 15under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.16    "Certified anesthesiologist assistant" means an individual 17licensed by the Department to provide anesthesia services 18under the supervision of an anesthesiologist.19    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 20Professional Regulation.21    "Email address of record" means the designated email 22address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 23application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 24by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.25    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and   SB1482- 3 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1Professional Regulation.2    "Supervision" means overseeing the activities of, and 3accepting responsibility for, the medical services rendered by 4the certified anesthesiologist assistant and maintaining 5physical proximity that allows the anesthesiologist to return 6to reestablish direct contact with the patient to meet medical 7needs and address any urgent or emergent clinical problems at 8all times that medical services are rendered by the certified 9anesthesiologist assistant. 10    Section 15. Address of record; email address of record. 11All applicants and licensees shall: 12        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 13    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 14    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 15    application for licensure or renewal of a license; and16        (2) inform the Department of any change of address of 17    record or email address of record within 14 days after 18    such change either through the Department's website or by 19    contacting the Department's licensure maintenance unit.  20    Section 20. Powers and duties of the Department. Subject 21to the provisions of this Act, the Department shall exercise 22the following functions, powers, and duties: 23        (1) Conduct or authorize examinations to ascertain the 24    qualifications and fitness of candidates for a license to   SB1482- 4 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    engage in the practice of certified anesthesiologist 2    assistant, pass upon the qualifications of applicants for 3    licenses, and issue licenses to those who are found to be 4    fit and qualified.5        (2) Adopt rules required for the administration and 6    enforcement of this Act.7        (3) Prescribe forms to be issued or electronic means 8    for the administration and enforcement of this Act and 9    rules adopted pursuant to this Act.10        (4) Conduct investigations related to possible 11    violations of this Act and rules adopted pursuant to this 12    Act.13        (5) Conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue 14    or renew licenses or to revoke, suspend, place on 15    probation, reprimand, or otherwise discipline a license 16    under this Act or take other nondisciplinary action. 17    Section 25. Applicability. This Act does not prohibit:18        (1) Any person licensed in this State under any other 19    Act from engaging in the practice for which the person is 20    licensed.21        (2) The practice as a certified anesthesiologist 22    assistant by a person who is employed by the United States 23    government or any bureau, division, or agency thereof 24    while in the discharge of the employee's official duties.25        (3) The practice as a certified anesthesiologist   SB1482- 5 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    assistant that is included in the certified 2    anesthesiologist assistant's program of study by students 3    enrolled in schools. 4    Section 30. Title; advertising; billing.5    (a) No certified anesthesiologist assistant shall use the 6title of doctor or associate with the licensee's name or any 7other term in the clinical setting or while in contact with 8patients under the licensee's care that would indicate to 9other persons that the licensee is qualified to engage in the 10general independent practice of anesthesiology or 11interventional pain management.12    (b) A licensee shall include in every advertisement for 13services regulated under this Act the licensee's title as it 14appears on the license or the initials authorized under this 15Act.16    (c) A certified anesthesiologist assistant shall not be 17allowed to bill patients or in any way charge for services. 18Nothing in this Act, however, shall be so construed as to 19prevent the employer of a certified anesthesiologist assistant 20from charging for services rendered by the certified 21anesthesiologist assistant. Payment for services rendered by a 22certified anesthesiologist assistant shall be made to the 23certified anesthesiologist assistant's employer if the payor 24would have made payment had the services been provided by an 25anesthesiologist.   SB1482- 6 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    Section 35. Supervision requirements.2    (a) As used in this Section, "supervision" means the use 3of the powers of direction and decision to coordinate, direct, 4and inspect the accomplishment of another, and to oversee the 5implementation of the anesthesiologist's intentions.6    (b) A certified anesthesiologist assistant may deliver 7medical care only under the supervision of an anesthesiologist 8and only as described in a supervision agreement between the 9certified anesthesiologist assistant and an anesthesiologist 10who represents the certified anesthesiologist assistant's 11employer. The supervising anesthesiologist shall be 12immediately available at all times while supervising a 13certified anesthesiologist assistant. The Department shall 14establish by rule the maximum number of certified 15anesthesiologist assistants that may be supervised by the 16supervising anesthesiologist and that number shall align with 17the national standards and maximum ratio set by the Centers 18for Medicare and Medicaid Services.19    For the purposes of this Section, "immediately available" 20means the medically directing anesthesiologist being in such 21physical proximity to allow the anesthesiologist to return to 22reestablish direct contact with the patient to meet the 23patient's medical needs and address any urgent or emergent 24problems. These responsibilities may also be met through 25careful coordination among anesthesiologists of the same group   SB1482- 7 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1or department. It is recognized that the design and size of 2various facilities, the severity of patient illnesses, and the 3complexity and demands of the particular surgical procedures 4make it impossible to define a specific time or distance for 5physical proximity.6    (c) A certified anesthesiologist assistant's practice may 7not exceed the licensee's education and training, the scope of 8practice of the supervising anesthesiologist, and the practice 9outlined in the certified anesthesiologist assistant 10supervision agreement. A medical care task assigned by the 11supervising anesthesiologist to the certified anesthesiologist 12assistant may not be delegated by the certified 13anesthesiologist assistant to another person, except for the 14preceptorship of a student in an anesthesiologist assistant 15training program.16    (d) A certified anesthesiologist assistant may assist only 17the supervising anesthesiologist in the delivery of medical 18care and may perform medical care tasks as well as any other 19tasks within the scope of training and education of the 20certified anesthesiologist assistant as assigned by the 21supervising anesthesiologist.22    (e) An anesthesiologist who represents a certified 23anesthesiologist assistant's employer shall review the 24supervision agreement with the certified anesthesiologist 25assistant at least annually. The supervision agreement shall 26be available for inspection at the location where the   SB1482- 8 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1certified anesthesiologist assistant practices. The 2supervision agreement may limit the practice of a certified 3anesthesiologist assistant to less than the full scope of 4practice authorized under this Act.5    (f) A certified anesthesiologist assistant shall be 6employed by a health care provider that is licensed in this 7State for the primary purpose of providing the medical 8services of physicians or that is an entity. If a certified 9anesthesiologist assistant's employer is not an 10anesthesiologist, the employer shall provide for, and not 11interfere with, an anesthesiologist's supervision of the 12certified anesthesiologist assistant.13    (g) A student in an anesthesiologist assistant training 14program may assist only an anesthesiologist in the delivery of 15medical care and may perform only medical care tasks assigned 16by the anesthesiologist. An anesthesiologist may delegate the 17preceptorship of a student in an anesthesiologist assistant 18training program to a qualified anesthesia provider. This 19Section shall not be interpreted to limit the number of other 20qualified anesthesia providers an anesthesiologist may 21supervise.22    (h) A student in an anesthesiologist assistant training 23program shall be identified as a student anesthesiologist 24assistant or an anesthesiologist assistant student and may not 25be identified as an "intern", "resident", or "fellow".   SB1482- 9 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    Section 40. Application for licensure. An application for 2an original license shall be made to the Department in writing 3on forms or electronically as prescribed by the Department and 4shall be accompanied by the required fee, which shall not be 5refundable. An application shall require information that, in 6the judgment of the Department, will enable the Department to 7pass on the qualifications of the applicant for a license.8    An applicant has 3 years from the date of application to 9complete the application process. If the process has not been 10completed in 3 years, the application shall be denied, the fee 11shall be forfeited, and the applicant must reapply and meet 12the requirements in effect at the time of reapplication. 13    Section 45. Social security number on license application. 14In addition to any other information required to be contained 15in the application, every application for an original license 16under this Act shall include the applicant's social security 17number or federal individual taxpayer identification number, 18which shall be retained in the agency's records pertaining to 19the license. 20    As soon as practical, the Department shall assign a 21customer's identification number to each applicant for a 22license. Every application for a renewal or restored license 23shall require the applicant's customer identification number. 24    Section 50. Qualifications for licensure. A person shall   SB1482- 10 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1be qualified for licensure as a certified anesthesiologist 2assistant and the Department may issue a certified 3anesthesiologist assistant license to such person, if the 4person has done all of the following:5        (1) Applied in writing or electronically in a form and 6    substance satisfactory to the Department and has not 7    violated any of the provisions of this Act or the rules 8    adopted under this Act. The Department may take into 9    consideration any felony conviction of the applicant but 10    shall deny the application if any conviction constitutes a 11    bar to licensure or is otherwise prohibited as provided by 12    law.13        (2) Submitted evidence satisfactory to the Department 14    that the applicant has:15            (A) obtained a master's degree in anesthesia from 16        an anesthesiologist assistant program approved by the 17        Department; and18            (B) passed an examination approved by the 19        Department.20        (3) Complied with all applicable rules of the 21    Department.  22    Section 55. Endorsement. Upon payment of the required fee, 23the Department may, in its discretion, license as a certified 24anesthesiologist assistant any person who is a certified 25anesthesiologist assistant licensed in another jurisdiction,   SB1482- 11 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1if the requirements for licensure in that jurisdiction were on 2the date of licensure either substantially equivalent to the 3requirements in force in this State on that date or equivalent 4to the requirements of this Act and the rules adopted under 5this Act and not otherwise prohibited by law. 6    Section 60. Criminal history records background check. 7Each applicant for licensure under Sections 40, 50, and 55 8shall have the applicant's fingerprints submitted to the 9Illinois State Police in an electronic format that complies 10with the form and manner for requesting and furnishing 11criminal history record information as prescribed by the 12Illinois State Police. These fingerprints shall be checked 13against the Illinois State Police and Federal Bureau of 14Investigation criminal history record databases now and 15hereafter filed. The Illinois State Police shall charge 16applicants a fee for conducting the criminal history records 17check, which shall be deposited into the State Police Services 18Fund and shall not exceed the actual cost of the records check. 19The Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 20identification, records of Illinois convictions to the 21Department. The Department may require applicants to pay a 22separate fingerprinting fee, either to the Department or to a 23vendor designated or approved by the Department. The 24Department, in its discretion, may allow an applicant who does 25not have reasonable access to a designated vendor to provide   SB1482- 12 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1the applicant's fingerprints in an alternative manner. The 2Department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this 3Section. 4    Section 65. Fees; deposit of fees and fines. 5    (a) The fees for the administration and enforcement of 6this Act, including, but not limited to, fees for original 7licensure, renewal, and restoration, shall be set by rule. The 8fees shall not be refundable.9    (b) All of the fees and fines collected under this Act 10shall be deposited into the Illinois State Medical 11Disciplinary Fund and be appropriated to the Department for 12the ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department in the 13administration and enforcement of this Act.  14    Section 70. Checks or order to Department dishonored 15because of insufficient funds. Any person who delivers a check 16or other payment to the Department that is returned to the 17Department unpaid by the financial institution upon which it 18is drawn shall pay to the Department, in addition to the amount 19already owed to the Department, a fine of $50. The fines 20imposed by this Section are in addition to any other 21discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed practice or 22practice on a nonrenewed license. The Department shall notify 23the person that payment of fees and fines shall be paid to the 24Department by certified check or money order within 30   SB1482- 13 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1calendar days after the notification. If, after the expiration 2of 30 days after the date of the notification, the person has 3failed to submit the necessary remittance, the Department 4shall automatically terminate the license or deny the 5application, without hearing. If, after termination or denial, 6the person seeks a license, the person shall apply to the 7Department for restoration or issuance of the license and pay 8all fees and fines due to the Department. The Department may 9establish a fee for the processing of an application for 10restoration of a license to pay all expenses of processing 11this application. The Secretary may waive the fines due under 12this Section in individual cases in which the Secretary finds 13that the fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily 14burdensome. 15    Section 75. Identification. No person may designate 16oneself as a certified anesthesiologist assistant, use or 17assume the title "certified anesthesiologist assistant", or 18append to the person's name the words or letters "certified 19anesthesiologist assistant" or "C.A.A." or any other titles, 20letters, or designation that represents or may tend to 21represent the person as a certified anesthesiologist assistant 22unless the person is licensed as a certified anesthesiologist 23assistant by the Department. A certified anesthesiologist 24assistant shall be clearly identified as a certified 25anesthesiologist assistant.   SB1482- 14 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    Section 80. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty.2    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts 3to practice, or holds oneself out to practice as a certified 4anesthesiologist assistant without being licensed under this 5Act shall, in addition to any other penalty provided by law, 6pay a civil penalty to the Department in an amount not to 7exceed $10,000 for each offense as determined by the 8Department. The civil penalty shall be assessed by the 9Department after a hearing is held in accordance with the 10provisions set forth in this Act regarding the provision of a 11hearing for the discipline of a licensee.12    (b) The Department has the authority and power to 13investigate any and all unlicensed activity.14    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 15the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 16The order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 17execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 18any court of record. 19    Section 85. Expiration and renewal of license. The 20expiration date and renewal period for each license issued 21under this Act shall be set by rule. Renewal shall be 22conditioned on paying the required fee and by meeting such 23other requirements as may be established by law or rule, 24including completion of continuing education.  SB1482- 15 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    Any certified anesthesiologist assistant who has permitted 2the license to expire or who has had the license on inactive 3status may have the license restored by making application to 4the Department and filing proof acceptable to the Department 5of the individual's fitness to have the license restored, and 6by paying the required fees. Proof of fitness may include 7sworn evidence certifying to active lawful practice in another 8jurisdiction.9    If the certified anesthesiologist assistant has not 10maintained an active practice in another jurisdiction 11satisfactory to the Department, the Department shall 12determine, by an evaluation program established by rule, the 13individual's fitness for restoration of the license and shall 14establish procedures and requirements for such restoration.15    However, any certified anesthesiologist assistant whose 16license expired while the individual was (i) in federal 17service on active duty with the Armed Forces of the United 18States, or the State Militia called into service or training, 19or (ii) in training or education under the supervision of the 20United States preliminary to induction into the military 21service, may have the individual's license restored without 22paying any lapsed renewal fees if within 2 years after 23honorable termination of such service, training, or education 24the individual furnishes the Department with satisfactory 25evidence to the effect that the individual has been so engaged 26and that the individual's service, training, or education has   SB1482- 16 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1been so terminated. 2    Section 90. Inactive status. Any certified 3anesthesiologist assistant who notifies the Department in 4writing on forms prescribed by the Department, may elect to 5place the license on an inactive status and shall, subject to 6rules of the Department, be excused from payment of renewal 7fees until the individual notifies the Department in writing 8of the individual's intention to restore the license.9    Any certified anesthesiologist assistant requesting 10restoration from inactive status shall be required to pay the 11current renewal fee and shall be required to restore the 12license, as provided in Section 85.13    Any certified anesthesiologist assistant whose license is 14in an inactive status shall not practice in this State.15    Any certified anesthesiologist assistant who engages in 16practice while the license is lapsed or on inactive status 17shall be considered to be practicing without a license, which 18shall be grounds for discipline under Sections 80 and 95. 19    Section 95. Grounds for disciplinary action.20    (a) The Department may refuse to issue or renew, or may 21revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 22disciplinary or nondisciplinary action with regard to any 23license issued under this Act as the Department may deem 24proper, including the issuance of fines not to exceed $10,000   SB1482- 17 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1for each violation, for any one or a combination of the 2following causes:3        (1) Material misstatement in furnishing information to 4    the Department.5        (2) Violations of this Act or the rules adopted under 6    this Act.7        (3) Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 8    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or 9    sentencing, including, but not limited to, convictions, 10    preceding sentences of supervision, conditional discharge, 11    or first offender probation, under the laws of any 12    jurisdiction of the United States that is: (i) a felony; 13    or (ii) a misdemeanor an essential element of which is 14    dishonesty or that is directly related to the practice of 15    the profession.16        (4) Making any misrepresentation for the purpose of 17    obtaining licenses.18        (5) Professional incompetence.19        (6) Aiding or assisting another person in violating 20    any provision of this Act or its rules.21        (7) Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 22    response to a written request made by the Department.23        (8) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 24    unprofessional conduct, as defined by rule, of a character 25    likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public.26        (9) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to alcohol,   SB1482- 18 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical agent or drug 2    that results in a certified anesthesiologist assistant's 3    inability to practice with reasonable judgment, skill, or 4    safety.5        (10) Discipline by another U.S. jurisdiction or 6    foreign nation, if at least one of the grounds for 7    discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to 8    those set forth in this Section.9        (11) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 10    from any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 11    association any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of 12    compensation for any professional services not actually or 13    personally rendered. Nothing in this paragraph affects any 14    bona fide independent contractor or employment 15    arrangements, which may include provisions for 16    compensation, health insurance, pension, or other 17    employment benefits, with persons or entities authorized 18    under this Act for the provision of services within the 19    scope of the licensee's practice under this Act.20        (12) A finding by the Board that the licensee, after 21    having the licensee's license placed on probationary 22    status has violated the terms of probation.23        (13) Abandonment of a patient.24        (14) Willfully making or filing false records or 25    reports in the certified anesthesiologist assistant's 26    practice, including, but not limited to, false records   SB1482- 19 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    filed with State agencies or departments.2        (15) Willfully failing to report an instance of 3    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 4    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.5        (16) Physical illness or mental illness or impairment 6    that results in the inability to practice the profession 7    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety, including, but 8    not limited to, deterioration through the aging process or 9    loss of motor skill.10        (17) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 11    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 12    under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and 13    upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 14    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 15    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 16    Child Reporting Act.17        (18) Gross negligence resulting in the permanent 18    injury or death of a patient.19        (19) Employment of fraud, deception, or any unlawful 20    means in applying for or securing a license as a certified 21    anesthesiologist assistant.22        (20) Exceeding the authority delegated to the 23    certified anesthesiologist assistant by the certified 24    anesthesiologist assistant's supervising 25    anesthesiologist.26        (21) Immoral conduct in the commission of any act,   SB1482- 20 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    such as sexual abuse, sexual misconduct, or sexual 2    exploitation related to the licensee's practice.3        (22) Violation of the Health Care Worker Self-Referral 4    Act.5        (23) Practicing under a false or assumed name, except 6    as provided by law.7        (24) Making a false or misleading statement regarding 8    the certified anesthesiologist assistant's skill or the 9    efficacy or value of the medicine, treatment, or remedy 10    prescribed by the certified anesthesiologist assistant in 11    the course of treatment.12        (25) Allowing another person to use the certified 13    anesthesiologist assistant's license to practice.14        (26) Prescribing, selling, administering, 15    distributing, giving, or self-administering a drug 16    classified as a controlled substance for other than 17    medically accepted therapeutic purposes.18        (27) Promotion of the sale of drugs, devices, 19    appliances, or goods provided for a patient in a manner to 20    exploit the patient for financial gain.21        (28) A pattern of practice or other behavior that 22    demonstrates incapacity or incompetence to practice under 23    this Act.24        (29) Violating State or federal laws, rules, or 25    regulations relating to controlled substances or other 26    legend drugs or ephedra as defined in the Ephedra   SB1482- 21 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    Prohibition Act.2        (30) Failure to establish and maintain records of 3    patient care and treatment as required by law.4        (31) Attempting to subvert or cheat on the designated 5    examination for licensure.6        (32) Willfully or negligently violating the 7    confidentiality between the certified anesthesiologist 8    assistant and patient, except as required by law.9        (33) Willfully failing to report an instance of 10    suspected abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or 11    self-neglect of an eligible adult as defined in and 12    required by the Adult Protective Services Act.13        (34) Being named as an abuser in a verified report by 14    the Department on Aging under the Adult Protective 15    Services Act and upon proof by clear and convincing 16    evidence that the licensee abused, neglected, or 17    financially exploited an eligible adult as defined in the 18    Adult Protective Services Act.19        (35) Failure to report to the Department an adverse 20    final action taken against the certified anesthesiologist 21    assistant by another licensing jurisdiction of the United 22    States or a foreign state or country, a peer review body, a 23    health care institution, a professional society or 24    association, a governmental agency, a law enforcement 25    agency, or a court for acts or conduct similar to acts or 26    conduct that would constitute grounds for action under   SB1482- 22 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    this Section.2        (36) Failure to provide copies of records of patient 3    care or treatment, except as required by law.4        (37) Violating the Compassionate Use of Medical 5    Cannabis Program Act.6    (b) The Department may, without a hearing, refuse to issue 7or renew or may suspend the license of any person who (i) fails 8to file a return, or to pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown 9in a filed return, or to pay any final assessment of the tax, 10penalty, or interest as required by any tax Act administered 11by the Department of Revenue, until the requirements of any 12such tax Act are satisfied or (ii) fails to pay any 13court-ordered child support as determined by a court order or 14by referral from the Department of Healthcare and Family 15Services, until the requirements of any such court order are 16satisfied.17    (c) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 18is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 19provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 20Code operates as an automatic suspension. The suspension will 21end only upon a finding by a court that the patient is no 22longer subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission 23and issues an order so finding and discharging the patient, 24and upon the recommendation of the Board to the Secretary that 25the licensee be allowed to resume the licensee's practice.26    (d) In enforcing this Section, the Department upon a   SB1482- 23 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1showing of a possible violation may compel an individual 2licensed to practice under this Act, or who has applied for 3licensure under this Act, to submit to a mental or physical 4examination, or both, which may include a substance abuse or 5sexual offender evaluation, as required by and at the expense 6of the Department.7    The Department shall specifically designate the examining 8physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches 9or, if applicable, the multidisciplinary team involved in 10providing the mental or physical examination or both. The 11multidisciplinary team shall be led by a physician licensed to 12practice medicine in all of its branches and may consist of one 13or more or a combination of physicians licensed to practice 14medicine in all of its branches, licensed clinical 15psychologists, licensed clinical social workers, licensed 16clinical professional counselors, and other professional and 17administrative staff. Any examining physician or member of the 18multidisciplinary team may require any person ordered to 19submit to an examination pursuant to this Section to submit to 20any additional supplemental testing deemed necessary to 21complete any examination or evaluation process, including, but 22not limited to, blood testing, urinalysis, psychological 23testing, or neuropsychological testing.24    The Department may order the examining physician or any 25member of the multidisciplinary team to provide to the 26Department any and all records, including business records,   SB1482- 24 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1that relate to the examination and evaluation, including any 2supplemental testing performed.3    The Department may order the examining physician or any 4member of the multidisciplinary team to present testimony 5concerning the mental or physical examination of the licensee 6or applicant. No information, report, record, or other 7documents in any way related to the examination shall be 8excluded by reason of any common law or statutory privilege 9relating to communications between the licensee or applicant 10and the examining physician or any member of the 11multidisciplinary team. No authorization is necessary from the 12licensee or applicant ordered to undergo an examination for 13the examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 14team to provide information, reports, records, or other 15documents or to provide any testimony regarding the 16examination and evaluation.17    The individual to be examined may have, at the 18individual's own expense, another physician of the 19individual's choice present during all aspects of this 20examination. However, that physician shall be present only to 21observe and may not interfere in any way with the examination.22    Failure of an individual to submit to a mental or physical 23examination, when ordered, shall result in an automatic 24suspension of the individual's license until the individual 25submits to the examination.26    If the Department finds an individual unable to practice   SB1482- 25 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1because of the reasons set forth in this Section, the 2Department may require that individual to submit to care, 3counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated 4by the Department, as a condition, term, or restriction for 5continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure to practice; or, 6in lieu of care, counseling, or treatment, the Department may 7file a complaint to immediately suspend, revoke, or otherwise 8discipline the license of the individual. An individual whose 9license was granted, continued, reinstated, renewed, 10disciplined, or supervised subject to such terms, conditions, 11or restrictions, and who fails to comply with such terms, 12conditions, or restrictions, shall be referred to the 13Secretary for a determination as to whether the individual 14shall have the individual's license suspended immediately, 15pending a hearing by the Department.16    In instances in which the Secretary immediately suspends 17an individual's license under this Section, a hearing on that 18individual's license must be convened by the Department within 1930 days after the suspension and completed without appreciable 20delay. The Department shall have the authority to review the 21subject individual's record of treatment and counseling 22regarding the impairment to the extent permitted by applicable 23federal statutes and regulations safeguarding the 24confidentiality of medical records.25    An individual licensed under this Act and affected under 26this Section shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate   SB1482- 26 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1to the Department that the individual can resume practice in 2compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the 3provisions of the individual's license.4    (e) An individual or organization acting in good faith, 5and not in a willful and wanton manner, in complying with this 6Section by providing a report or other information to the 7Board, by assisting in the investigation or preparation of a 8report or information, by participating in proceedings of the 9Board, or by serving as a member of the Board, shall not be 10subject to criminal prosecution or civil damages as a result 11of such actions.12    (f) Members of the Board shall be indemnified by the State 13for any actions occurring within the scope of services of the 14Board, done in good faith and not willful and wanton in nature. 15The Attorney General shall defend all such actions unless the 16Attorney General determines either that there would be a 17conflict of interest in such representation or that the 18actions complained of were not in good faith or were willful 19and wanton.20    If the Attorney General declines representation, the 21member has the right to employ counsel of the member's choice, 22whose fees shall be provided by the State, after approval by 23the Attorney General, unless there is a determination by a 24court that the member's actions were not in good faith or were 25willful and wanton.26    The member must notify the Attorney General within 7 days   SB1482- 27 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1after receipt of notice of the initiation of any action 2involving services of the Board. Failure to so notify the 3Attorney General constitutes an absolute waiver of the right 4to a defense and indemnification.5    The Attorney General shall determine, within 7 days after 6receiving such notice, whether the Attorney General will 7undertake to represent the member. 8    Section 100. Continuing education. The Department shall 9adopt rules for continuing education for persons licensed 10under this Act. The continuing education rules shall ensure 11that licensees are given the opportunity to participate in 12programs sponsored by or through their State or national 13professional organizations, hospitals, or other providers of 14continuing education. The rules shall also address waivers in 15part or in whole for good cause, including, but not limited to, 16illness or hardship. Each licensee is responsible for 17maintaining records of completion of continuing education and 18shall be prepared to produce the records when requested by the 19Department. 20    Section 105. Violations; injunction; cease and desist 21order. 22    (a) If any person violates the provisions of this Act, the 23Secretary may, in the name of the People of the State of 24Illinois, through the Attorney General, petition for an order   SB1482- 28 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1enjoining such violation or for an order enforcing compliance 2with this Act. Upon the filing of a verified petition, the 3court with appropriate jurisdiction may issue a temporary 4restraining order without notice or bond, and may 5preliminarily and permanently enjoin such violation. If it is 6established that such person has violated or is violating the 7injunction, the court may punish the offender for contempt of 8court. Proceedings under this Section shall be in addition to 9all other remedies and penalties provided by this Act.10    (b) Whenever, in the opinion of the Department, a person 11violates any provision of this Act, the Department may issue a 12rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not 13be entered against such person. The rule shall clearly set 14forth the grounds relied upon by the Department and shall 15allow at least 7 days from the date of the rule to file an 16answer satisfactory to the Department. Failure to answer to 17the satisfaction of the Department shall cause an order to 18cease and desist to be issued.  19    Section 110. Investigations; notice and hearing. 20    (a) The Department may investigate the actions of any 21applicant or of any person holding or claiming to hold a 22license under this Act.23    (b) The Department shall, before disciplining an applicant 24or licensee, at least 30 days prior to the date set for the 25hearing: (i) notify, in writing, the accused of the charges   SB1482- 29 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1made and the time and place for the hearing on the charges, 2(ii) direct the person to file a written answer to the charges 3under oath within 20 days after the service of the notice, and 4(iii) inform the applicant or licensee that failure to file an 5answer will result in a default being entered against the 6applicant or licensee.7    (c) Written or electronic notice, and any notice in the 8subsequent proceeding, may be served by personal delivery, by 9email, or by mail to the applicant or licensee at the 10applicant's or licensee's address of record or email address 11of record.12    (d) At the time and place fixed in the notice, the Board or 13hearing officer appointed by the Secretary shall proceed to 14hear the charges and the parties or their counsel shall be 15accorded ample opportunity to present any statements, 16testimony, evidence, and argument as may be pertinent to the 17charges or to their defense. The Board or hearing officer may 18continue the hearing from time to time.19    (e) In case the person, after receiving the notice, fails 20to file an answer, the person's license may, in the discretion 21of the Secretary, having first received the recommendation of 22the Board, be suspended, revoked, or placed on probationary 23status, or be subject to whatever disciplinary action the 24Secretary deems proper, including limiting the scope, nature, 25or extent of the person's practice or the imposition of a fine, 26without hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute   SB1482- 30 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1sufficient grounds for that action under the Act. 2    Section 115. Record of proceedings; transcript. The 3Department, at its expense, shall preserve a record of all 4proceedings at the formal hearing of any case. The notice of 5hearing, complaint, all other documents in the nature of 6pleadings, written motions filed in the proceedings, the 7transcript of testimony, the report of the Board, and orders 8of the Department shall be in the record of such proceeding. 9The Department shall furnish a copy of the record to any person 10upon payment of the fee required under Section 2105-115 of the 11Department of Professional Regulation Law. 12    Section 120. Subpoenas; depositions; oaths. The Department 13shall have the power to subpoena and to bring before it any 14person and to take testimony either orally or by deposition, 15or both, with the same fees and mileage and in the same manner 16as prescribed in civil cases in the courts of this State.17    The Secretary, the designated hearing officer, and every 18member of the Board shall have power to administer oaths to 19witnesses at any hearing which the Department is authorized to 20conduct, and any other oath authorized in any Act administered 21by the Department. 22    Section 125. Compelling testimony. Any court, upon 23application of the Department, designated hearing officer, or   SB1482- 31 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1the applicant or licensee against whom proceedings under this 2Act are pending, may enter an order requiring the attendance 3of witnesses and their testimony, and the production of 4papers, files, books, and records in connection with any 5hearing or investigation. The court may compel obedience to 6its order by proceedings for contempt. 7    Section 130. Findings and recommendations. At the 8conclusion of the hearing, the Board shall present to the 9Secretary a written report of its findings of fact, 10conclusions of law, and recommendations. The report shall 11contain a finding whether or not the licensee violated this 12Act or failed to comply with the conditions required in this 13Act. The Board shall specify the nature of the violation or 14failure to comply, and shall make its recommendations to the 15Secretary. 16    Section 135. Hearing; motion for rehearing. 17    (a) The Board or hearing officer appointed by the 18Secretary shall hear evidence in support of the formal charges 19and evidence produced by the licensee. At the conclusion of 20the hearing, the Board shall present to the Secretary a 21written report of its findings of fact, conclusions of law, 22and recommendations.23    (b) At the conclusion of the hearing, a copy of the hearing 24officer's or Board's report shall be served upon the applicant   SB1482- 32 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1or licensee by the Department, either personally or as 2provided in this Act for the service of the notice of hearing. 3Within 20 calendar days after service, the applicant or 4licensee may present to the Secretary a motion in writing for a 5rehearing which shall specify the particular grounds for 6rehearing. The Department may respond to the motion for 7rehearing within 20 calendar days after its service on the 8Department. If no motion for rehearing is filed, then upon the 9expiration of the time specified for filing such a motion, or 10upon denial of a motion for rehearing, the Secretary may enter 11an order in accordance with the recommendations of the Board 12or hearing officer. If the applicant or licensee orders from 13the reporting service and pays for a transcript of the record 14within the time for filing a motion for rehearing, the 20-day 15period within which a motion may be filed shall commence upon 16the delivery of the transcript to the applicant or licensee.17    (c) If the Secretary disagrees in any regard with the 18report of the Board, the Secretary may issue an order contrary 19to the report.20    (d) Whenever the Secretary is not satisfied that 21substantial justice has been done, the Secretary may order a 22rehearing by the same or another hearing officer.23    (e) At any point in any investigation or disciplinary 24proceeding provided for in this Act, both parties may agree to 25a negotiated consent order. The consent order shall be final 26upon signature of the Secretary.   SB1482- 33 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    Section 140. Appointment of a hearing officer. 2Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the Secretary 3has the authority to appoint any attorney duly licensed to 4practice law in the State of Illinois to serve as the hearing 5officer in any action for refusal to issue or renew a license 6or to discipline a licensee. The hearing officer shall have 7full authority to conduct the hearing. The hearing officer 8shall report the hearing officer's findings of fact, 9conclusions of law, and recommendations to the Board. 10    Section 145. Order or certified copy thereof; prima facie 11proof. An order or a certified copy thereof, over the seal of 12the Department and purporting to be signed by the Secretary, 13shall be prima facie proof that:14        (1) such signature is the genuine signature of the 15    Secretary;16        (2) such Secretary is duly appointed and qualified; 17    and18        (3) the Board and the members thereof are qualified to 19    act.  20    Section 150. Restoration. At any time after the successful 21completion of the minimum term of probation, suspension, or 22revocation of any license, the Department may restore the 23license to the licensee upon the written recommendation of the   SB1482- 34 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1Board unless after an investigation and hearing the Board or 2Secretary determines that restoration is not in the public 3interest. Where circumstances of suspension or revocation so 4indicate, the Secretary may require an examination of the 5licensee prior to restoring the license. No person whose 6license has been revoked as authorized in this Act may apply 7for restoration of that license until such time as provided 8for in the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 9    Section 155. Surrender of license. Upon the revocation or 10suspension of any license, the licensee shall immediately 11surrender the license to the Department. If the licensee fails 12to do so, the Department shall have the right to seize the 13license. 14    Section 160. Summary suspension of a license. The 15Secretary may summarily suspend the license of a certified 16anesthesiologist assistant without a hearing simultaneously 17with the institution of proceedings for a hearing provided for 18in this Act if the Secretary finds that evidence in the 19Secretary's possession indicates that a licensee's 20continuation in practice would constitute an imminent danger 21to the public. In the event the Secretary summarily suspends 22such license without a hearing, a hearing by the Board or 23hearing officer shall be commenced within 30 calendar days 24after the suspension has occurred.   SB1482- 35 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    Section 165. Administrative review. 2    (a) All final administrative decisions of the Secretary 3are subject to judicial review pursuant to the Administrative 4Review Law and all rules adopted pursuant thereto. The term 5"administrative decision" is defined as in Section 3-101 of 6the Code of Civil Procedure.7    (b) Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced in 8the circuit court of the county in which the party applying for 9review resides, but if the party is not a resident of Illinois, 10the venue shall be in Sangamon County.  11    Section 170. Certification of record; costs. The 12Department shall not be required to certify any record to the 13court, to file an answer in court, or to otherwise appear in 14any court in a judicial review proceeding, unless and until 15the Department has received from the plaintiff payment of the 16cost of furnishing and certifying the record, which costs 17shall be determined by the Department. Failure on the part of 18the plaintiff to file a receipt in court shall be grounds for 19dismissal of the action. 20    Section 175. Confidentiality. All information collected by 21the Department in the course of an examination or 22investigation of a licensee or applicant, including, but not 23limited to, any complaint against a licensee filed with the   SB1482- 36 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1Department and information collected to investigate any such 2complaint, shall be maintained for the confidential use of the 3Department and shall not be disclosed. The Department may not 4disclose the information to anyone other than law enforcement 5officials, other regulatory agencies that have an appropriate 6regulatory interest as determined by the Secretary, or a party 7presenting a lawful subpoena to the Department. Information 8and documents disclosed to a federal, State, county, or local 9law enforcement agency shall not be disclosed by the agency 10for any purpose to any other agency or person. A formal 11complaint filed against a licensee by the Department or any 12order issued by the Department against a licensee or applicant 13shall be a public record, except as otherwise prohibited by 14law. 15    Section 180. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The 16Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is hereby expressly 17adopted and incorporated herein as if all of the provisions of 18that Act were included in this Act, except that the provision 19of subsection (d) of Section 10-65 of the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act that provides that at hearings 21the licensee has the right to show compliance with all lawful 22requirements for retention, continuation, or renewal of the 23license is specifically excluded. 24    Section 185. Home rule. It is declared to be the public   SB1482- 37 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1policy of this State, pursuant to paragraph (h) of Section 6 of 2Article VII of the Illinois Constitution of 1970, that any 3power or function set forth in this Act to be exercised by the 4State is an exclusive State power or function. Such power or 5function shall not be exercised concurrently, either directly 6or indirectly, by any unit of local government, including home 7rule units, except as otherwise provided in this Act. 8    Section 900. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 9changing Section 4.40 as follows: 10    (5 ILCS 80/4.40)11    Sec. 4.40. Acts repealed on January 1, 2030. The following 12Acts are repealed on January 1, 2030:13    The Auction License Act.14    The Certified Anesthesiologist Assistant Practice Act. 15    The Genetic Counselor Licensing Act. 16    The Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989.17    The Illinois Certified Shorthand Reporters Act of 1984. 18    The Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989.19    The Orthotics, Prosthetics, and Pedorthics Practice Act.20    The Perfusionist Practice Act.21    The Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989.22    The Real Estate License Act of 2000.23    The Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.24(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-763, eff. 1-1-25;   SB1482- 38 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1103-816, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 905. The Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act 3is amended by changing Section 6.5 as follows: 4    (210 ILCS 5/6.5)5    Sec. 6.5. Clinical privileges; advanced practice 6registered nurses. All ambulatory surgical treatment centers 7(ASTC) licensed under this Act shall comply with the following 8requirements:9        (1) No ASTC policy, rule, regulation, or practice 10    shall be inconsistent with the provision of adequate 11    collaboration and consultation in accordance with Section 12    54.5 of the Medical Practice Act of 1987.13        (2) Operative surgical procedures shall be performed 14    only by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all 15    its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, a 16    dentist licensed under the Illinois Dental Practice Act, 17    or a podiatric physician licensed under the Podiatric 18    Medical Practice Act of 1987, with medical staff 19    membership and surgical clinical privileges granted by the 20    consulting committee of the ASTC. A licensed physician, 21    dentist, or podiatric physician may be assisted by a 22    physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 23    branches, dentist, dental assistant, podiatric physician, 24    licensed advanced practice registered nurse, licensed   SB1482- 39 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    physician assistant, licensed registered nurse, licensed 2    practical nurse, surgical assistant, surgical technician, 3    licensed certified anesthesiologist assistant, or other 4    individuals granted clinical privileges to assist in 5    surgery by the consulting committee of the ASTC. Payment 6    for services rendered by an assistant in surgery who is 7    not an ambulatory surgical treatment center employee shall 8    be paid at the appropriate non-physician modifier rate if 9    the payor would have made payment had the same services 10    been provided by a physician.11        (2.5) A registered nurse licensed under the Nurse 12    Practice Act and qualified by training and experience in 13    operating room nursing shall be present in the operating 14    room and function as the circulating nurse during all 15    invasive or operative procedures. For purposes of this 16    paragraph (2.5), "circulating nurse" means a registered 17    nurse who is responsible for coordinating all nursing 18    care, patient safety needs, and the needs of the surgical 19    team in the operating room during an invasive or operative 20    procedure. 21        (3) An advanced practice registered nurse is not 22    required to possess prescriptive authority or a written 23    collaborative agreement meeting the requirements of the 24    Nurse Practice Act to provide advanced practice registered 25    nursing services in an ambulatory surgical treatment 26    center. An advanced practice registered nurse must possess   SB1482- 40 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    clinical privileges granted by the consulting medical 2    staff committee and ambulatory surgical treatment center 3    in order to provide services. Individual advanced practice 4    registered nurses may also be granted clinical privileges 5    to order, select, and administer medications, including 6    controlled substances, to provide delineated care. The 7    attending physician must determine the advanced practice 8    registered nurse's role in providing care for his or her 9    patients, except as otherwise provided in the consulting 10    staff policies. The consulting medical staff committee 11    shall periodically review the services of advanced 12    practice registered nurses granted privileges. 13        (4) The anesthesia service shall be under the 14    direction of a physician licensed to practice medicine in 15    all its branches who has had specialized preparation or 16    experience in the area or who has completed a residency in 17    anesthesiology. An anesthesiologist, Board certified or 18    Board eligible, is recommended. Anesthesia services may 19    only be administered pursuant to the order of a physician 20    licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, 21    licensed dentist, or licensed podiatric physician.22            (A) The individuals who, with clinical privileges 23        granted by the medical staff and ASTC, may administer 24        anesthesia services are limited to the following:25                (i) an anesthesiologist; or26                (ii) a physician licensed to practice medicine   SB1482- 41 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1            in all its branches; or2                (iii) a dentist with authority to administer 3            anesthesia under Section 8.1 of the Illinois 4            Dental Practice Act; or5                (iv) a licensed certified registered nurse 6            anesthetist; or7                (v) a podiatric physician licensed under the 8            Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987; or .9                (vi) a licensed certified anesthesiologist 10            assistant under the supervision of an 11            anesthesiologist.12            (B) For anesthesia services, an anesthesiologist 13        shall participate through discussion of and agreement 14        with the anesthesia plan and shall remain physically 15        present and be available on the premises during the 16        delivery of anesthesia services for diagnosis, 17        consultation, and treatment of emergency medical 18        conditions. In the absence of 24-hour availability of 19        anesthesiologists with clinical privileges, an 20        alternate policy (requiring participation, presence, 21        and availability of a physician licensed to practice 22        medicine in all its branches) shall be developed by 23        the medical staff consulting committee in consultation 24        with the anesthesia service and included in the 25        medical staff consulting committee policies.26            (C) A certified registered nurse anesthetist is   SB1482- 42 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1        not required to possess prescriptive authority or a 2        written collaborative agreement meeting the 3        requirements of Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice 4        Act to provide anesthesia services ordered by a 5        licensed physician, dentist, or podiatric physician. 6        Licensed certified registered nurse anesthetists are 7        authorized to select, order, and administer drugs and 8        apply the appropriate medical devices in the provision 9        of anesthesia services under the anesthesia plan 10        agreed with by the anesthesiologist or, in the absence 11        of an available anesthesiologist with clinical 12        privileges, agreed with by the operating physician, 13        operating dentist, or operating podiatric physician in 14        accordance with the medical staff consulting committee 15        policies of a licensed ambulatory surgical treatment 16        center.17(Source: P.A. 99-642, eff. 7-28-16; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 18    Section 910. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 19changing Section 10.7 as follows: 20    (210 ILCS 85/10.7)21    Sec. 10.7. Clinical privileges; advanced practice 22registered nurses. All hospitals licensed under this Act 23shall comply with the following requirements:24        (1) No hospital policy, rule, regulation, or practice   SB1482- 43 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    shall be inconsistent with the provision of adequate 2    collaboration and consultation in accordance with Section 3    54.5 of the Medical Practice Act of 1987.4        (2) Operative surgical procedures shall be performed 5    only by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all 6    its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, a 7    dentist licensed under the Illinois Dental Practice Act, 8    or a podiatric physician licensed under the Podiatric 9    Medical Practice Act of 1987, with medical staff 10    membership and surgical clinical privileges granted at the 11    hospital. A licensed physician, dentist, or podiatric 12    physician may be assisted by a physician licensed to 13    practice medicine in all its branches, dentist, dental 14    assistant, podiatric physician, licensed advanced practice 15    registered nurse, licensed physician assistant, licensed 16    registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, surgical 17    assistant, surgical technician, licensed certified 18    anesthesiologist assistant, or other individuals granted 19    clinical privileges to assist in surgery at the hospital. 20    Payment for services rendered by an assistant in surgery 21    who is not a hospital employee shall be paid at the 22    appropriate non-physician modifier rate if the payor would 23    have made payment had the same services been provided by a 24    physician.25        (2.5) A registered nurse licensed under the Nurse 26    Practice Act and qualified by training and experience in   SB1482- 44 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    operating room nursing shall be present in the operating 2    room and function as the circulating nurse during all 3    invasive or operative procedures. For purposes of this 4    paragraph (2.5), "circulating nurse" means a registered 5    nurse who is responsible for coordinating all nursing 6    care, patient safety needs, and the needs of the surgical 7    team in the operating room during an invasive or operative 8    procedure. 9        (3) An advanced practice registered nurse is not 10    required to possess prescriptive authority or a written 11    collaborative agreement meeting the requirements of the 12    Nurse Practice Act to provide advanced practice registered 13    nursing services in a hospital. An advanced practice 14    registered nurse must possess clinical privileges 15    recommended by the medical staff and granted by the 16    hospital in order to provide services. Individual advanced 17    practice registered nurses may also be granted clinical 18    privileges to order, select, and administer medications, 19    including controlled substances, to provide delineated 20    care. The attending physician must determine the advanced 21    practice registered nurse's role in providing care for his 22    or her patients, except as otherwise provided in medical 23    staff bylaws. The medical staff shall periodically review 24    the services of advanced practice registered nurses 25    granted privileges. This review shall be conducted in 26    accordance with item (2) of subsection (a) of Section 10.8   SB1482- 45 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1    of this Act for advanced practice registered nurses 2    employed by the hospital. 3        (4) The anesthesia service shall be under the 4    direction of a physician licensed to practice medicine in 5    all its branches who has had specialized preparation or 6    experience in the area or who has completed a residency in 7    anesthesiology. An anesthesiologist, Board certified or 8    Board eligible, is recommended. Anesthesia services may 9    only be administered pursuant to the order of a physician 10    licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, 11    licensed dentist, or licensed podiatric physician.12            (A) The individuals who, with clinical privileges 13        granted at the hospital, may administer anesthesia 14        services are limited to the following:15                (i) an anesthesiologist; or16                (ii) a physician licensed to practice medicine 17            in all its branches; or18                (iii) a dentist with authority to administer 19            anesthesia under Section 8.1 of the Illinois 20            Dental Practice Act; or21                (iv) a licensed certified registered nurse 22            anesthetist; or23                (v) a podiatric physician licensed under the 24            Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987; or .25                (vi) a licensed certified anesthesiologist 26            assistant under the supervision of an   SB1482- 46 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1            anesthesiologist.2            (B) For anesthesia services, an anesthesiologist 3        shall participate through discussion of and agreement 4        with the anesthesia plan and shall remain physically 5        present and be available on the premises during the 6        delivery of anesthesia services for diagnosis, 7        consultation, and treatment of emergency medical 8        conditions. In the absence of 24-hour availability of 9        anesthesiologists with medical staff privileges, an 10        alternate policy (requiring participation, presence, 11        and availability of a physician licensed to practice 12        medicine in all its branches) shall be developed by 13        the medical staff and licensed hospital in 14        consultation with the anesthesia service.15            (C) A certified registered nurse anesthetist is 16        not required to possess prescriptive authority or a 17        written collaborative agreement meeting the 18        requirements of Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice 19        Act to provide anesthesia services ordered by a 20        licensed physician, dentist, or podiatric physician. 21        Licensed certified registered nurse anesthetists are 22        authorized to select, order, and administer drugs and 23        apply the appropriate medical devices in the provision 24        of anesthesia services under the anesthesia plan 25        agreed with by the anesthesiologist or, in the absence 26        of an available anesthesiologist with clinical   SB1482- 47 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1        privileges, agreed with by the operating physician, 2        operating dentist, or operating podiatric physician in 3        accordance with the hospital's alternative policy.4(Source: P.A. 99-642, eff. 7-28-16; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 5    Section 915. The Medical Practice Act of 1987 is amended 6by changing Sections 7.1 and 54.5 and by adding Section 54.7 as 7follows: 8    (225 ILCS 60/7.1)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)10    Sec. 7.1. Medical Board.11    (A) There is hereby created the Illinois State Medical 12Board. The Medical Board shall consist of 18 17 members, to be 13appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of 14the Senate. All members shall be residents of the State, not 15more than 9 8 of whom shall be members of the same political 16party. All members shall be voting members. Eight members 17shall be physicians licensed to practice medicine in all of 18its branches in Illinois possessing the degree of doctor of 19medicine. Two members shall be physicians licensed to practice 20medicine in all its branches in Illinois possessing the degree 21of doctor of osteopathy or osteopathic medicine. Two of the 22physician members shall be physicians who collaborate with 23physician assistants. Two members shall be chiropractic 24physicians licensed to practice in Illinois and possessing the   SB1482- 48 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1degree of doctor of chiropractic. Two members shall be 2physician assistants licensed to practice in Illinois. One 3member shall be a certified anesthesiologist assistant 4licensed to practice in Illinois. Three members shall be 5members of the public, who shall not be engaged in any way, 6directly or indirectly, as providers of health care.7    (B) Members of the Medical Board shall be appointed for 8terms of 4 years. Upon the expiration of the term of any 9member, their successor shall be appointed for a term of 4 10years by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the 11Senate. The Governor shall fill any vacancy for the remainder 12of the unexpired term with the advice and consent of the 13Senate. Upon recommendation of the Medical Board, any member 14of the Medical Board may be removed by the Governor for 15misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty, after 16notice, and a public hearing, unless such notice and hearing 17shall be expressly waived in writing. Each member shall serve 18on the Medical Board until their successor is appointed and 19qualified. No member of the Medical Board shall serve more 20than 2 consecutive 4-year terms.21    In making appointments the Governor shall attempt to 22ensure that the various social and geographic regions of the 23State of Illinois are properly represented.24    In making the designation of persons to act for the 25several professions represented on the Medical Board, the 26Governor shall give due consideration to recommendations by   SB1482- 49 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1members of the respective professions and by organizations 2therein.3    (C) The Medical Board shall annually elect one of its 4voting members as chairperson and one as vice chairperson. No 5officer shall be elected more than twice in succession to the 6same office. Each officer shall serve until their successor 7has been elected and qualified.8    (D) A majority of the Medical Board members currently 9appointed shall constitute a quorum. A vacancy in the 10membership of the Medical Board shall not impair the right of a 11quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of 12the Medical Board. Any action taken by the Medical Board under 13this Act may be authorized by resolution at any regular or 14special meeting and each such resolution shall take effect 15immediately. The Medical Board shall meet at least quarterly.16    (E) Each member shall be paid their necessary expenses 17while engaged in the performance of their duties.18    (F) The Secretary shall select a Chief Medical Coordinator 19and not less than 2 Deputy Medical Coordinators who shall not 20be members of the Medical Board. Each medical coordinator 21shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine in all of 22its branches, and the Secretary shall set their rates of 23compensation. The Secretary shall assign at least one medical 24coordinator to a region composed of Cook County and such other 25counties as the Secretary may deem appropriate, and such 26medical coordinator or coordinators shall locate their office   SB1482- 50 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1in Chicago. The Secretary shall assign at least one medical 2coordinator to a region composed of the balance of counties in 3the State, and such medical coordinator or coordinators shall 4locate their office in Springfield. The Chief Medical 5Coordinator shall be the chief enforcement officer of this 6Act. None of the functions, powers, or duties of the 7Department with respect to policies regarding enforcement or 8discipline under this Act, including the adoption of such 9rules as may be necessary for the administration of this Act, 10shall be exercised by the Department except upon review of the 11Medical Board.12    (G) The Secretary shall employ, in conformity with the 13Personnel Code, investigators who are college graduates with 14at least 2 years of investigative experience or one year of 15advanced medical education. Upon the written request of the 16Medical Board, the Secretary shall employ, in conformity with 17the Personnel Code, such other professional, technical, 18investigative, and clerical help, either on a full or 19part-time basis as the Medical Board deems necessary for the 20proper performance of its duties.21    (H) Upon the specific request of the Medical Board, signed 22by either the chairperson, vice chairperson, or a medical 23coordinator of the Medical Board, the Department of Human 24Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 25the Department of State Police, or any other law enforcement 26agency located in this State shall make available any and all   SB1482- 51 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1information that they have in their possession regarding a 2particular case then under investigation by the Medical Board.3    (I) Members of the Medical Board shall be immune from suit 4in any action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other 5acts performed in good faith as members of the Medical Board.6    (J) The Medical Board may compile and establish a 7statewide roster of physicians and other medical 8professionals, including the several medical specialties, of 9such physicians and medical professionals, who have agreed to 10serve from time to time as advisors to the medical 11coordinators. Such advisors shall assist the medical 12coordinators or the Medical Board in their investigations and 13participation in complaints against physicians. Such advisors 14shall serve under contract and shall be reimbursed at a 15reasonable rate for the services provided, plus reasonable 16expenses incurred. While serving in this capacity, the 17advisor, for any act undertaken in good faith and in the 18conduct of his or her duties under this Section, shall be 19immune from civil suit.20(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 21    (225 ILCS 60/54.5)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)23    Sec. 54.5. Physician delegation of authority to physician 24assistants, certified anesthesiologist assistants, advanced 25practice registered nurses without full practice authority,   SB1482- 52 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1and prescribing psychologists. 2    (a) Physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its 3branches may delegate care and treatment responsibilities to a 4physician assistant under guidelines in accordance with the 5requirements of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987. 6A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 7may enter into collaborative agreements with no more than 7 8full-time equivalent physician assistants, except in a 9hospital, hospital affiliate, or ambulatory surgical treatment 10center as set forth by Section 7.7 of the Physician Assistant 11Practice Act of 1987 and as provided in subsection (a-5).12    (a-5) A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 13branches may collaborate with more than 7 physician assistants 14when the services are provided in a federal primary care 15health professional shortage area with a Health Professional 16Shortage Area score greater than or equal to 12, as determined 17by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. 18    The collaborating physician must keep appropriate 19documentation of meeting this exemption and make it available 20to the Department upon request.21    (b) A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 22branches in active clinical practice may collaborate with an 23advanced practice registered nurse in accordance with the 24requirements of the Nurse Practice Act. Collaboration is for 25the purpose of providing medical consultation, and no 26employment relationship is required. A written collaborative   SB1482- 53 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1agreement shall conform to the requirements of Section 65-35 2of the Nurse Practice Act. The written collaborative agreement 3shall be for services for which the collaborating physician 4can provide adequate collaboration. A written collaborative 5agreement shall be adequate with respect to collaboration with 6advanced practice registered nurses if all of the following 7apply:8        (1) The agreement is written to promote the exercise 9    of professional judgment by the advanced practice 10    registered nurse commensurate with his or her education 11    and experience.12        (2) The advanced practice registered nurse provides 13    services based upon a written collaborative agreement with 14    the collaborating physician, except as set forth in 15    subsection (b-5) of this Section. With respect to labor 16    and delivery, the collaborating physician must provide 17    delivery services in order to participate with a certified 18    nurse midwife.19        (3) Methods of communication are available with the 20    collaborating physician in person or through 21    telecommunications for consultation, collaboration, and 22    referral as needed to address patient care needs.23    (b-5) An anesthesiologist or physician licensed to 24practice medicine in all its branches may collaborate with a 25certified registered nurse anesthetist in accordance with 26Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice Act for the provision of   SB1482- 54 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1anesthesia services. With respect to the provision of 2anesthesia services, the collaborating anesthesiologist or 3physician shall have training and experience in the delivery 4of anesthesia services consistent with Department rules. 5Collaboration shall be adequate if:6        (1) an anesthesiologist or a physician participates in 7    the joint formulation and joint approval of orders or 8    guidelines and periodically reviews such orders and the 9    services provided patients under such orders; and10        (2) for anesthesia services, the anesthesiologist or 11    physician participates through discussion of and agreement 12    with the anesthesia plan and is physically present and 13    available on the premises during the delivery of 14    anesthesia services for diagnosis, consultation, and 15    treatment of emergency medical conditions. Anesthesia 16    services in a hospital shall be conducted in accordance 17    with Section 10.7 of the Hospital Licensing Act and in an 18    ambulatory surgical treatment center in accordance with 19    Section 6.5 of the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center 20    Act.21    (b-10) The anesthesiologist or operating physician must 22agree with the anesthesia plan prior to the delivery of 23services.24    (b-15) Under delegation from a supervising 25anesthesiologist, a certified anesthesiologist assistant 26licensed under the Certified Anesthesiologist Assistant   SB1482- 55 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1Practice Act is authorized to select, order, and administer 2drugs, performing skill sets within the scope of the certified 3anesthesiologist assistant's education and training, and apply 4the appropriate medical devices in the provision of anesthesia 5services under the anesthesia plan agreed to by the 6supervising anesthesiologist. 7    (c) The collaborating physician shall have access to the 8medical records of all patients attended by a physician 9assistant. The collaborating physician shall have access to 10the medical records of all patients attended to by an advanced 11practice registered nurse.12    (d) (Blank).13    (e) A physician shall not be liable for the acts or 14omissions of a prescribing psychologist, physician assistant, 15or advanced practice registered nurse solely on the basis of 16having signed a supervision agreement or guidelines or a 17collaborative agreement, an order, a standing medical order, a 18standing delegation order, or other order or guideline 19authorizing a prescribing psychologist, physician assistant, 20or advanced practice registered nurse to perform acts, unless 21the physician has reason to believe the prescribing 22psychologist, physician assistant, or advanced practice 23registered nurse lacked the competency to perform the act or 24acts or commits willful and wanton misconduct.25    (f) A collaborating physician may, but is not required to, 26delegate prescriptive authority to an advanced practice   SB1482- 56 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1registered nurse as part of a written collaborative agreement, 2and the delegation of prescriptive authority shall conform to 3the requirements of Section 65-40 of the Nurse Practice Act. 4    (g) A collaborating physician may, but is not required to, 5delegate prescriptive authority to a physician assistant as 6part of a written collaborative agreement, and the delegation 7of prescriptive authority shall conform to the requirements of 8Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987. 9    (h) (Blank).10    (i) A collaborating physician shall delegate prescriptive 11authority to a prescribing psychologist as part of a written 12collaborative agreement, and the delegation of prescriptive 13authority shall conform to the requirements of Section 4.3 of 14the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act. 15    (j) As set forth in Section 22.2 of this Act, a licensee 16under this Act may not directly or indirectly divide, share, 17or split any professional fee or other form of compensation 18for professional services with anyone in exchange for a 19referral or otherwise, other than as provided in Section 22.2. 20(Source: P.A. 103-228, eff. 1-1-24.) 21    (225 ILCS 60/54.7 new)22    Sec. 54.7. Certified anesthesiologist assistants; 23administration of anesthesia. Nothing in this Act precludes a 24certified anesthesiologist assistant licensed under the 25Certified Anesthesiologist Assistant Practice Act from   SB1482- 57 -LRB104 06901 BAB 16937 b1selecting, ordering, and administering drugs, perform skill 2sets within the scope of the certified anesthesiologist 3assistant's education and training, and applying the 4appropriate medical devices in the provision of anesthesia 5services under the anesthesia plan agreed to by the 6supervising anesthesiologist licensed to practice medicine in 7this State.